Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.432

Manufactured home construction and safety standards and regulations—Rules.

(1) The department may adopt all standards and regulations adopted by the secretary under the national manufactured home construction and safety standards act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426) for manufactured home construction and safety standards. If any deletions or amendments to the federal standards or regulations are thereafter made and notice thereof is given to the department, the standards or regulations shall be considered automatically adopted by the state under this chapter after the expiration of thirty days from publication in the federal register of a final order describing the deletions or amendments unless within that thirty day period the department objects to the deletion or amendment. In case of objection, the department shall proceed under the rule making procedure of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The department shall adopt rules with respect to manufactured homes that require the prior written approval of the department before changes or alterations may be made to a manufactured home that differ from the construction standards provided for in this section.

(3) For purposes of implementing this section, by January 1, 2006, the department shall adopt requirements for manufactured homes built before June 15, 1976.

(4) Except as provided in RCW 43.22.436, it is unlawful for any person to lease, sell, or offer for sale, within this state, a manufactured home unless the home meets the requirements of the rules provided for in this section.

[ 2005 c 399 s 3; 2002 c 268 s 7; 2001 c 335 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 21 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Finding—Effective dates—2002 c 268: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.

Application—2001 c 335: See note following RCW 43.22.335.

Construction—1977 ex.s. c 21: See note following RCW 43.22.431.